Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-101.9 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A school district or public charter school may employ or


accept as a volunteer one or more chaplains to provide support,


services, and programs for school employees and students as assigned


by the school district board of education or the governing body of


the charter school. A chaplain employed or volunteering pursuant to

Req. No. 3251 Page 1


the provisions of this subsection shall not be required to be


certified by the State Board of Education. For the purposes of this


section, “chaplain” means an ordained or authorized pastor,


minister, priest, or other ecclesiastical dignitary of any


denomination who has been duly ordained or authorized by the church


to which such person belongs.


B. 1. A school district or public charter school that employs


or accepts as a volunteer one or more chaplains pursuant to


subsection A of this section shall request that the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) provide a national criminal history


record check for the employed or volunteer chaplain or chaplains


prior to the individual working or volunteering at the school


district or public charter school. The national criminal history


record check shall comply with the provisions of Section 5-142 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. A school district or public charter school shall not employ


or accept as a volunteer a chaplain who has been convicted of or is


a defendant for an offense that requires the defendant to register


as a sex offender.


C. No student or school employee shall be required to seek


support or services from an employed or volunteer chaplain.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 3251 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3251 EB 1/14/2026 2:15:22 PM









































Req. No. 3251 Page 3